Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 93.1
The Rhode Island Holocaust and Genocide Education Commission [see Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-93.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Rhode Island Holocaust and Genocide Education Commission.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-93.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Genocide” means any act committed with intent to destroy, in whole or in substantial part, a national, ethnic, racial, or religious group such as:

Killing members of that group;

Causing serious bodily injury to members of that group;

Causing permanent impairment of the mental faculties of members of the group through drugs, torture, or similar techniques;

Subjecting the group to conditions of life that are intended to cause the physical destruction of the group in whole or in part;

Imposing measures intended to prevent births within the group; or

Forcibly transferring or attempting to transfer children of the group to another group, as defined by the Genocide Convention Implementation Act of 1987 (18 U.S.C. § 1091).

“Holocaust” means the systematic, bureaucratic, state-sponsored persecution and murder of approximately six million (6,000,000) Jews and five million (5,000,000) other individuals by the Nazi regime and its collaborators.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-93.1-3.
Holocaust and genocide education commission.

There is hereby created a permanent commission to be known as the Rhode Island Holocaust and genocide education commission to consist of thirteen (13) members: one of whom shall be the Rhode Island commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or designee; one of whom shall be the president of the Rhode Island Superintendent’s Association, or designee; one of whom shall be a member of the Rhode Island Association of School Principals, or designee; one of whom shall be the president of the Rhode Island chapter of the American Federation of Teachers, or designee; one of whom shall be the president of the Rhode Island Chapter of the National Education Association, or designee; one of whom shall be the president of the Rhode Island Association of School Committees, or designee; and seven (7) of whom shall be appointed by the governor to serve a term of three (3) years, at least three (3) of whom shall be involved in Holocaust and genocide education or have a personal connection or experience with the Holocaust or genocide; and at least three (3) of whom shall have expertise in investigating, analyzing, or researching the Holocaust or genocide.

When making appointments, the governor shall ensure that appointees represent diverse communities affected by genocide.

A member of the commission may be removed by the governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance in office, after being given a written statement of the charges and an opportunity to be publicly heard on such charges by the general assembly.

Vacancies in the commission shall be filled in the manner provided under subsection (a) of this section. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member’s predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. Any appointed member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration of that member’s term until the member’s successor takes office.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-93.1-4.
Meetings and bylaws.

The commission shall meet at least six (6) times during a calendar year.

At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and other officers from the voting members.

The commission shall adopt bylaws governing the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-93.1-5.
Quorum.

A quorum at the meeting shall consist of seven (7) voting members present.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-93.1-6.
Expenses.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-93.1-7.
Duties and responsibilities of the commission.

The commission shall:

Gather and disseminate Holocaust and genocide information throughout this state;

Take inventory of current statewide Holocaust and genocide education programs and initiatives, and partner with the department of elementary and secondary education to prepare a comprehensive educational program to fill program and initiative gaps;

Plan and publicize Holocaust and Genocide Remembrance Month activities to be commemorated annually in April of each year, and promote public awareness of issues relating to the Holocaust and genocide education through public education programs;

Advise and educate the governor, general assembly, and state departments and agencies regarding the nature, magnitude, and priorities of Holocaust and genocide education, and develop policies and programs to address those needs;

Seek opportunities to provide resources for schools to effectively teach about the Holocaust and genocide;

Apply for and accept grants and gifts from public and private sources to be administered by the commission or subcontracted to local public or nonprofit agencies that shall use the grants and gifts for the purpose intended;

Review and approve grants that are administered or subcontracted by the commission;

Establish advisory committees for special subjects, as needed, to facilitate and maximize community participation and subject matter expertise in the operation of the commission;

Advisory committees shall be comprised of members representing community organizations, charitable institutions, elementary and secondary schools, higher education institutions, faith-based organizations, public officials, and other persons as determined by the office;

Establish relationships with local and state governments, federal officials, nonprofit organizations, and the private sector to promote and ensure the highest standards of Holocaust and genocide education;

Endeavor to ensure that Holocaust and genocide survivors, liberators, educators, and others involved in Holocaust and genocide education have access to decision-making bodies in local, state, national, and international departments, agencies, and genocide education and memorial organizations; and

Submit a written annual report of the commission’s activities, accomplishments, and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 274, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.